Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.080

Licenses—Issuance—Display. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

The board shall forward to the secretary the name of each applicant entitled to a license under this chapter. The secretary shall promptly issue to such applicant a license authorizing such applicant to use the title "psychologist". Each licensed psychologist shall keep his or her license displayed in a conspicuous place in his or her principal place of business.

[ 1996 c 191 s 66; 1991 c 3 s 199; 1986 c 27 s 4; 1965 c 70 s 8; 1955 c 305 s 8.]

PDFRCW 18.83.080

Licenses—Issuance—Display. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

The board shall forward to the secretary the name of each applicant entitled to a license under this chapter. The secretary shall promptly issue to such applicant a license authorizing such applicant to use the title "psychologist" or "licensed psychological associate." Each licensed psychologist or licensed psychological associate shall keep his or her license displayed in a conspicuous place in his or her principal place of business.

[ 2024 c 371 s 4; 1996 c 191 s 66; 1991 c 3 s 199; 1986 c 27 s 4; 1965 c 70 s 8; 1955 c 305 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.